lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 11239 Y 2
SFX 11239 ušti ušti/412 . 300
SFX 11239 uštis uštis/412 . 300

SFX 11240 Y 2
SFX 11240 ušti ušti/413 . 300
SFX 11240 uštis uštis/413 . 300

SFX 11241 Y 2
SFX 11241 ušti ušti/414 . 300
SFX 11241 uštis uštis/414 . 300

SFX 11242 Y 2
SFX 11242 ušti ušti/415 . 300
SFX 11242 uštis uštis/415 . 300

SFX 11243 Y 2
SFX 11243 ušti ušti/416 . 300
SFX 11243 uštis uštis/416 . 300

SFX 11244 Y 2
SFX 11244 ušti ušti/417 . 300
SFX 11244 uštis uštis/417 . 300

SFX 11255 Y 2
SFX 11255 ušti ūšta/418 . 301
SFX 11255 uštis ūštasi/418 . 301

SFX 11256 Y 2
SFX 11256 ušti ūšta/419 . 301
SFX 11256 uštis ūštasi/419 . 301

SFX 11257 Y 2
SFX 11257 ušti ūšta/420 . 301
SFX 11257 uštis ūštasi/420 . 301

SFX 11258 Y 2
SFX 11258 ušti ūšta/421 . 301
SFX 11258 uštis ūštasi/421 . 301

SFX 11259 Y 2
SFX 11259 ušti ūšta/422 . 301
SFX 11259 uštis ūštasi/422 . 301

SFX 11260 Y 2
SFX 11260 ušti ūšta/423 . 301
SFX 11260 uštis ūštasi/423 . 301

SFX 11261 Y 2
SFX 11261 ušti ūšta/424 . 301
SFX 11261 uštis ūštasi/424 . 301

SFX 11262 Y 2
SFX 11262 ušti ūšta/425 . 301
SFX 11262 uštis ūštasi/425 . 301

SFX 11263 Y 2
SFX 11263 ušti ūšta/426 . 301
SFX 11263 uštis ūštasi/426 . 301

SFX 11273 Y 1
SFX 11273 ušti ūštie/427 . 301

SFX 11274 Y 1
SFX 11274 uštis ūštie/428 . 301

SFX 11275 Y 2
SFX 11275 ušti ušo/429 . 302
SFX 11275 uštis ušosi/429 . 302

SFX 11276 Y 2
SFX 11276 ušti ušo/430 . 302
SFX 11276 uštis ušosi/430 . 302

SFX 11277 Y 2
SFX 11277 ušti ušo/431 . 302
SFX 11277 uštis ušosi/431 . 302

SFX 11281 Y 2
SFX 11281 uzti uzti/408 . 300
SFX 11281 uztis uztis/408 . 300

SFX 11282 Y 2
SFX 11282 uzti uzti/409 . 300
SFX 11282 uztis uztis/409 . 300

SFX 11283 Y 2
SFX 11283 uzti uzti/410 . 300
SFX 11283 uztis uztis/410 . 300

SFX 11284 Y 2
SFX 11284 uzti uzti/411 . 300
SFX 11284 uztis uztis/411 . 300

SFX 11285 Y 2
SFX 11285 uzti uzti/412 . 300
SFX 11285 uztis uztis/412 . 300

SFX 11286 Y 2
SFX 11286 uzti uzti/413 . 300
SFX 11286 uztis uztis/413 . 300

SFX 11287 Y 2
SFX 11287 uzti uzti/414 . 300
SFX 11287 uztis uztis/414 . 300

SFX 11288 Y 2
SFX 11288 uzti uzti/415 . 300
SFX 11288 uztis uztis/415 . 300

SFX 11289 Y 2
SFX 11289 uzti uzti/416 . 300
SFX 11289 uztis uztis/416 . 300

SFX 11290 Y 2
SFX 11290 uzti uzti/417 . 300
SFX 11290 uztis uztis/417 . 300

SFX 11301 Y 2
SFX 11301 uzti ūzda/418 . 301
SFX 11301 uztis ūzdasi/418 . 301

SFX 11302 Y 2
SFX 11302 uzti ūzda/419 . 301
SFX 11302 uztis ūzdasi/419 . 301

SFX 11303 Y 2
SFX 11303 uzti ūzda/420 . 301
SFX 11303 uztis ūzdasi/420 . 301

SFX 11304 Y 2
SFX 11304 uzti ūzda/421 . 301
SFX 11304 uztis ūzdasi/421 . 301

SFX 11305 Y 2
SFX 11305 uzti ūzda/422 . 301
SFX 11305 uztis ūzdasi/422 . 301

SFX 11306 Y 2
SFX 11306 uzti ūzda/423 . 301
SFX 11306 uztis ūzdasi/423 . 301

SFX 11307 Y 2
SFX 11307 uzti ūzda/424 . 301
SFX 11307 uztis ūzdasi/424 . 301

SFX 11308 Y 2
SFX 11308 uzti ūzda/425 . 301
SFX 11308 uztis ūzdasi/425 . 301

SFX 11309 Y 2
SFX 11309 uzti ūzda/426 . 301
SFX 11309 uztis ūzdasi/426 . 301

SFX 11319 Y 1
SFX 11319 uzti ūzdie/427 . 301

SFX 11320 Y 1
SFX 11320 uztis ūzdie/428 . 301

SFX 11321 Y 2
SFX 11321 uzti uzdo/429 . 302
SFX 11321 uztis uzdosi/429 . 302

SFX 11322 Y 2
SFX 11322 uzti uzdo/430 . 302
SFX 11322 uztis uzdosi/430 . 302

SFX 11323 Y 2
SFX 11323 uzti uzdo/431 . 302
SFX 11323 uztis uzdosi/431 . 302

SFX 11327 Y 2
SFX 11327 auti auti/408 . 300
SFX 11327 autis autis/408 . 300

SFX 11328 Y 2
SFX 11328 auti auti/409 . 300
SFX 11328 autis autis/409 . 300

SFX 11329 Y 2
SFX 11329 auti auti/410 . 300
SFX 11329 autis autis/410 . 300

SFX 11330 Y 2
SFX 11330 auti auti/411 . 300
SFX 11330 autis autis/411 . 300

SFX 11331 Y 2
SFX 11331 auti auti/412 . 300
SFX 11331 autis autis/412 . 300

SFX 11332 Y 2
SFX 11332 auti auti/413 . 300
SFX 11332 autis autis/413 . 300

SFX 11333 Y 2
SFX 11333 auti auti/414 . 300
SFX 11333 autis autis/414 . 300

SFX 11334 Y 2
SFX 11334 auti auti/415 . 300
SFX 11334 autis autis/415 . 300

SFX 11335 Y 2
SFX 11335 auti auti/416 . 300
SFX 11335 autis autis/416 . 300

SFX 11336 Y 2
SFX 11336 auti auti/417 . 300
SFX 11336 autis autis/417 . 300

SFX 11347 Y 2
SFX 11347 auti auja/418 . 301
SFX 11347 autis aujasi/418 . 301

SFX 11348 Y 2
SFX 11348 auti auja/419 . 301
SFX 11348 autis aujasi/419 . 301

SFX 11349 Y 2
SFX 11349 auti auja/420 . 301
SFX 11349 autis aujasi/420 . 301

SFX 11350 Y 2
SFX 11350 auti auja/421 . 301
SFX 11350 autis aujasi/421 . 301

SFX 11351 Y 2
SFX 11351 auti auja/422 . 301
SFX 11351 autis aujasi/422 . 301

SFX 11352 Y 2
SFX 11352 auti auja/423 . 301
SFX 11352 autis aujasi/423 . 301

SFX 11353 Y 2
SFX 11353 auti auja/424 . 301
SFX 11353 autis aujasi/424 . 301

SFX 11354 Y 2
SFX 11354 auti auja/425 . 301
SFX 11354 autis aujasi/425 . 301

SFX 11355 Y 2
SFX 11355 auti auja/426 . 301
SFX 11355 autis aujasi/426 . 301

SFX 11365 Y 1
SFX 11365 auti aujie/427 . 301

SFX 11366 Y 1
SFX 11366 autis aujie/428 . 301

SFX 11367 Y 2
SFX 11367 auti ovė/429 . 302
SFX 11367 autis ovėsi/429 . 302

SFX 11368 Y 2
SFX 11368 auti ovė/430 . 302
SFX 11368 autis ovėsi/430 . 302

SFX 11369 Y 2
SFX 11369 auti ovė/431 . 302
SFX 11369 autis ovėsi/431 . 302

SFX 11373 Y 2
SFX 11373 ąsti ąsti/408 . 300
SFX 11373 ąstis ąstis/408 . 300

SFX 11374 Y 2
SFX 11374 ąsti ąsti/409 . 300
SFX 11374 ąstis ąstis/409 . 300

SFX 11375 Y 2
SFX 11375 ąsti ąsti/410 . 300
SFX 11375 ąstis ąstis/410 . 300

SFX 11376 Y 2
SFX 11376 ąsti ąsti/411 . 300
SFX 11376 ąstis ąstis/411 . 300

SFX 11377 Y 2
SFX 11377 ąsti ąsti/412 . 300
SFX 11377 ąstis ąstis/412 . 300

SFX 11378 Y 2
SFX 11378 ąsti ąsti/413 . 300
SFX 11378 ąstis ąstis/413 . 300

SFX 11379 Y 2
SFX 11379 ąsti ąsti/414 . 300
SFX 11379 ąstis ąstis/414 . 300

SFX 11380 Y 2
SFX 11380 ąsti ąsti/415 . 300
SFX 11380 ąstis ąstis/415 . 300

SFX 11381 Y 2
SFX 11381 ąsti ąsti/416 . 300
SFX 11381 ąstis ąstis/416 . 300

SFX 11382 Y 2
SFX 11382 ąsti ąsti/417 . 300
SFX 11382 ąstis ąstis/417 . 300

SFX 11393 Y 2
SFX 11393 ąsti ąsta/418 . 301
SFX 11393 ąstis ąstasi/418 . 301

SFX 11394 Y 2
SFX 11394 ąsti ąsta/419 . 301
SFX 11394 ąstis ąstasi/419 . 301

SFX 11395 Y 2
SFX 11395 ąsti ąsta/420 . 301
SFX 11395 ąstis ąstasi/420 . 301

SFX 11396 Y 2
SFX 11396 ąsti ąsta/421 . 301
SFX 11396 ąstis ąstasi/421 . 301

SFX 11397 Y 2
SFX 11397 ąsti ąsta/422 . 301
SFX 11397 ąstis ąstasi/422 . 301

SFX 11398 Y 2
SFX 11398 ąsti ąsta/423 . 301
SFX 11398 ąstis ąstasi/423 . 301

SFX 11399 Y 2
SFX 11399 ąsti ąsta/424 . 301
SFX 11399 ąstis ąstasi/424 . 301

SFX 11400 Y 2
SFX 11400 ąsti ąsta/425 . 301
SFX 11400 ąstis ąstasi/425 . 301

SFX 11401 Y 2
SFX 11401 ąsti ąsta/426 . 301
SFX 11401 ąstis ąstasi/426 . 301

SFX 11411 Y 1
SFX 11411 ąsti ąstie/427 . 301

SFX 11412 Y 1
SFX 11412 ąstis ąstie/428 . 301

SFX 11413 Y 2
SFX 11413 ąsti ando/429 . 302
SFX 11413 ąstis andosi/429 . 302

SFX 11414 Y 2
SFX 11414 ąsti ando/430 . 302
SFX 11414 ąstis andosi/430 . 302

SFX 11415 Y 2
SFX 11415 ąsti ando/431 . 302
SFX 11415 ąstis andosi/431 . 302

SFX 11419 Y 2
SFX 11419 erti erti/408 . 300
SFX 11419 ertis ertis/408 . 300

SFX 11420 Y 2
SFX 11420 erti erti/409 . 300
SFX 11420 ertis ertis/409 . 300

SFX 11421 Y 2
SFX 11421 erti erti/410 . 300
SFX 11421 ertis ertis/410 . 300

SFX 11422 Y 2
SFX 11422 erti erti/411 . 300
SFX 11422 ertis ertis/411 . 300

SFX 11423 Y 2
SFX 11423 erti erti/412 . 300
SFX 11423 ertis ertis/412 . 300

SFX 11424 Y 2
SFX 11424 erti erti/413 . 300
SFX 11424 ertis ertis/413 . 300

SFX 11425 Y 2
SFX 11425 erti erti/414 . 300
SFX 11425 ertis ertis/414 . 300

SFX 11426 Y 2
SFX 11426 erti erti/415 . 300
SFX 11426 ertis ertis/415 . 300

SFX 11427 Y 2
SFX 11427 erti erti/416 . 300
SFX 11427 ertis ertis/416 . 300

SFX 11428 Y 2
SFX 11428 erti erti/417 . 300
SFX 11428 ertis ertis/417 . 300

SFX 11439 Y 4
SFX 11439 erti ęra/418 . 301
SFX 11439 ertis ęrasi/418 . 301
SFX 11439 erti ersta/418 . 301
SFX 11439 ertis erstasi/418 . 301

SFX 11440 Y 4
SFX 11440 erti ęra/419 . 301
SFX 11440 ertis ęrasi/419 . 301
SFX 11440 erti ersta/419 . 301
SFX 11440 ertis erstasi/419 . 301

AF 11373,11374,11393,11413,9999 # 161
AF 11235,11236,11255,11275,9999 # 187
AF 11419,11420,11439,11479,9999 # 285
AF 11327,11328,11347,11367,9999 # 342
AF 11281,11282,11301,11321,9999 # 374
