lt-LT.dic
apsigąsti/161	13
aptriušti/187	11
išgverti/285	11
išsigąsti/161	13
neaptriušti/187	33
nebeišsigąsti/161	34
neišsigąsti/161	34
nenusigąsti/161	34
nenutriušti/187	33
nepabizniauti/342	33
nepersigąsti/161	34
nusigąsti/161	13
nutriušti/187	11
pabizniauti/342	11
patriušti/187	11
persigąsti/161	13
subruzti/374	11
sutriušti/187	11
teneišsigąsti/161	13
